Maryland, session 2026, SB0944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–619.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE REENTRY READINESS PROGRAM.
(3) “RELEASING INSTITUTION” MEANS A STATE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0944*

SENATE BILL 944
(4) “RETURNING CITIZEN” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL CONFINED IN A
STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY WHO IS EXPECTED TO BE RELEASED WITHIN 90
DAYS.
(B) (1) THERE IS A REENTRY READINESS PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL WORK JOINTLY WITH THE MOTOR
VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION, THE DIVISION OF VITAL RECORDS IN THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, AND THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR TO STAFF AND
ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) (1) THE PROGRAM STAFF SHALL ASSIST EACH RETURNING CITIZEN
IN:
(I) ENROLLING IN VOCATIONAL, WORKFORCE TRAINING, AND
JOB PLACEMENT PROGRAMS;
(II) OBTAINING A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE RETURNING
CITIZEN’S BIRTH CERTIFICATE; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
OBTAINING A PHOTO IDENTIFICATION OR DRIVER’S LICENSE.
(2) AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED RELEASE FROM
CONFINEMENT OF A RETURNING CITIZEN, PROGRAM STAFF WITHIN THE RELEASING
INSTITUTION SHALL ASSIST A RETURNING CITIZEN IN COMPLETING AND
SUBMITTING ANY NECESSARY APPLICATIONS AND DOCUMENTS FOR ENROLLING IN
A VOCATIONAL, WORKFORCE TRAINING, OR JOB PLACEMENT PROGRAM.
(3) AT LEAST 60 DAYS BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED RELEASE FROM
CONFINEMENT OF A RETURNING CITIZEN, THE COMMISSIONER AND THE PROGRAM
STAFF WITHIN A RELEASING INSTITUTION SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE THE RETURNING CITIZEN THE APPROPRIATE
FORMS FOR OBTAINING A PHOTO IDENTIFICATION CARD UNDER § 12–301 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE OR A DRIVER’S LICENSE FROM THE MOTOR VEHICLE
ADMINISTRATION; AND
(II) ASSIST THE RETURNING CITIZEN IN COMPLETING THE
FORMS.

SENATE BILL 944 3
(D) AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE THE ANTICIPATED RELEASE FROM
CONFINEMENT OF A RETURNING CITIZEN, PROGRAM STAFF SHALL VERIFY THAT
THE RETURNING CITIZEN HAS RECEIVED ASSISTANCE AS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.